Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.130

Feed lots—Fee for each head of cattle handled—Failure to pay. (Effective until July 1, 2026.)

Each licensee shall pay to the director a fee of 28 cents for each head of cattle handled through the licensee's feed lot. The licensee must pay a call out fee of $20 to the department for each day and for each livestock inspector who performs inspections at each certified feed lot. Payment of the fees shall be made by the licensee on a monthly basis. Failure to pay as required shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of a certified feed lot license. The director shall not renew a certified feed lot license if a licensee has failed to make prompt and timely payments. No call out fee is charged for an inspection done by a certified veterinarian or field livestock inspector.

[ 2023 c 46 s 5; 2019 c 92 s 8; 2006 c 156 s 2; 2003 c 326 s 56; 1997 c 356 s 7; 1997 c 356 s 6; 1994 c 46 s 24; 1994 c 46 s 15; 1993 c 354 s 4; 1991 c 109 s 14; 1979 c 81 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 13.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2023 c 46 ss 1, 3, 5, and 6: See note following RCW 16.57.015.

Expiration date—2023 c 46; 2022 c 158; 2019 c 92 ss 1, 5, 8, and 11: See note following RCW 16.57.015.

Effective date—2006 c 156: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective dates—1997 c 356: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective date—1994 c 46 ss 21-25: See note following RCW 16.65.090.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.

PDFRCW 16.58.130

Feed lots—Fee for each head of cattle handled—Failure to pay. (Effective July 1, 2026.)

Each licensee shall pay to the director a fee of twenty-five cents for each head of cattle handled through the licensee's feed lot. Payment of the fee shall be made by the licensee on a monthly basis. Failure to pay as required shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of a certified feed lot license. The director shall not renew a certified feed lot license if a licensee has failed to make prompt and timely payments.

[ 2006 c 156 s 2; 2003 c 326 s 56; 1997 c 356 s 7; 1997 c 356 s 6; 1994 c 46 s 24; 1994 c 46 s 15; 1993 c 354 s 4; 1991 c 109 s 14; 1979 c 81 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 156: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective dates—1997 c 356: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective date—1994 c 46 ss 21-25: See note following RCW 16.65.090.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.